Utah statutes.
34-20-9.   Collective bargaining -- Representatives -- Powers of board.
(1) (a)  Representatives designated or selected for the purposes of collective
bargaining by the majority of the employees in a unit appropriate for those
purposes shall be the exclusive representatives of all the employees in that
unit for the purposes of collective bargaining in respect to rate of pay,
wages, hours of employment, and of other conditions of employment.
(b)  Any individual employee or group of employees may present grievances to
their employer at any time.
(2)  The board shall decide in each case whether, in order to ensure to
employees the full benefit of their right to self-organization and to
collective bargaining, and otherwise to effectuate the policies of this act,
the unit appropriate for the purposes of collective bargaining shall be the
employer unit, craft unit, plant unit, or subdivision of same.
(3)  Whenever a question affecting intrastate commerce or the orderly
operation of industry arises concerning the representation of employees, the
board may investigate such controversy and certify to the parties in writing,
the name or names of the representatives that have been designated or
selected.  In any such investigation, the board shall provide for an
appropriate hearing upon due notice, either in conjunction with a proceeding
under Section 34-20-10, or otherwise, and may take a secret ballot of
employees, or utilize any other suitable method to ascertain such
representatives.
(4) (a)  Whenever an order of the board made according to Section 34-20-10 is
based in whole or in part upon facts certified following an investigation
under Subsection (3), and there is a petition for the enforcement or review of
such order, the certification and the record of the investigation shall be
included in the transcript of the entire record required to be filed under
Section 34-20-10.
(b)  The decree of the court enforcing, modifying, or setting aside in whole
or in part the order of the board shall be made and entered upon the
pleadings, testimony, and proceedings set forth in the transcript.
